inc/V-CLASS_II_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - çíihlgaayaa - ENGLISH : # CLASS_II_STEM_2

     çíihlgii+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: çíihlgaayaa
     çíihlgii+V+INDIRECT+PAST: çíihlgaayaan
     çíihlgii+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: çíihlgaayaas
     çíihlgii+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: çíihlgaayaa.ang
     çíihlgii+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: çíihlgaay'ahlanggang
     çíihlgii+V+CERTAIN+PAST: çíihlgaay'ahlanggan
     çíihlgii+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: çíihlgaay'ahlanggiinii
     çíihlgii+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: çíihlgaay'ahlans
     çíihlgii+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: çíihlgaayaa'ahlang
     çíihlgii+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: çíihlgaayaa'ahlanggaa
     çíihlgii+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: çíihlgaayaa'ahlanggang
     çíihlgii+V+REFLEXIVE: çíihlgaay'ahl
